Washington statutes.
RCW 3.58.020

Salaries of part time district judges.

The annual salaries of part time district judges shall be set by the citizens' commission on salaries.

[ 1991 c 338 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 35; 1982 c 29 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 255 s 9; 1974 ex.s. c 95 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 192 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 101.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 255: See note following RCW 43.03.010.

District judges—Full time—Other: RCW 3.34.040.